Utah statutes.
75-4-206.   Power of representatives in transition.
The power of a domiciliary foreign personal representative under Section
75-4-201 or 75-4-205 shall be exercised only if there is no administration or
application therefor pending in this state. An application or petition for
local administration of the estate terminates the power of the foreign
personal representative to act under Section 75-4-205, but the local court may
allow the foreign personal representative to exercise limited powers to
preserve the estate. No person who, before receiving actual notice of a
pending local administration, has changed his position in reliance upon the
powers of a foreign personal representative shall be prejudiced by reason of
the application or petition for, or grant of, local administration. The local
personal representative is subject to all duties and obligations which have
accrued by virtue of the exercise of the powers by the foreign personal
representative and may be substituted for him in any action or proceedings in
this state.
